Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.150

Rights of married persons or domestic partners in general.

Every married person or domestic partner shall hereafter have the same right and liberty to acquire, hold, enjoy and dispose of every species of property, and to sue and be sued, as if he or she were unmarried or were not in a state registered domestic partnership.

[ 2008 c 6 s 614; Code 1881 s 2396; RRS s 6900.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Separate property

of spouse: RCW 26.16.010.

of domestic partner: RCW 26.16.020.